Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-404
Public utility districts; creation; protest; effect.

If within thirty days there is filed, as provided in section 18-403, a written protest signed by the record owners of a majority of the foot frontage of taxable property in a water main district, gas main district, sanitary sewer district, storm water disposal district, or other public utility district, then the filing of such protest shall operate as a repeal or rescission of the ordinance or resolution creating such district, but if no such protest is filed within thirty days, then the city council, village board of trustees, or board of directors shall proceed to contract for and on behalf of such city, village, or metropolitan utilities district for the extension or enlargement of the main or utility service so ordered or to make such extension or enlargement.

Laws 1921, c. 110, § 4, p. 387;

C.S.1922, § 4478;

C.S.1929, § 18-1004;

R.S.1943, § 18-404;

Laws 1959, c. 53, § 1, p. 244;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 65;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 15.